South Dakota, session 2026, HB1243.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 13-24:
The motto of the State of South Dakota, "Under God the People Rule," must be
displayed in each public school. The display must be placed in a prominent location within
each public school. The display must be at least eleven inches by eight and one-half inches
in size, and may take the form of a mounted plaque, student artwork, or any other
appropriate form, as determined by the school principal.
For purposes of this section, "prominent location," means a school entryway,
cafeteria, or other common area where students are most likely to see the state motto
display.
Section 2. That § 13-24-24 be AMENDED:
13-24-24. For any lawsuit brought or any complaint filed against a school district,
an employee of a school district, the board of a school district, or a member thereof as a
result of a school district displaying the national motto of the United States in accordance
with § 13-24-23 or the motto of this state in accordance with section 1 of this Act, the
attorney general shall provide legal representation at no cost to the school district,
employee, school board, or member of the school board.
In addition to the expenses of representation, the state shall assume financial
responsibility for any other related expense incurred by the school district, an employee,
the board, or member thereof, including any award for monetary damages, attorney's
fees, and costs for which the school district, an employee, the board, or a member thereof
would be otherwise responsible.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.